District of Columbia statutes.
47-1804.06

Authority to reject returns.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the Mayor is hereby authorized to reject any return of income reported on a cash basis where, in his opinion, the net income of the taxpayer is not properly reflected and cannot be determined on such basis, and to require the return to be filed on such a basis as in his opinion will properly reflect the net income of the taxpayer.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 340, ch. 258, art. I, title IV, § 6
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-1804.6.
1973 Ed., § 47-1561e.

Prior Codifications